North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1. Adult Care Homes.
§ 131D-2.11.
Inspections, monitoring, and review by State agency and county departments of social services.

State Inspection and Monitoring. — The Department shall ensure that adult care homes required to be licensed by this Article are monitored for licensure compliance on a regular basis. All facilities licensed under this Article and adult care units in nursing homes are subject to inspections at all times by the Secretary. Except as provided in subsection (a1) of this section, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall inspect all adult care homes and adult care units in nursing homes on an annual basis. Beginning July 1, 2012, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall include as part of its inspection of all adult care homes a review of the facility’s compliance with

G.S. 131D-4.4

A(b) and safe practices for injections and any other procedures during which bleeding typically occurs. In addition, the Department shall ensure that adult care homes are inspected every two years to determine compliance with physical plant and life-safety requirements.If the annual or biennial licensure inspection of an adult care home is conducted separately from the inspection required every two years to determine compliance with physical plant and life-safety requirements, then the Division of Health Service Regulation shall not cite, as part of the annual or biennial licensure inspection, any noncompliance with any law or regulation that was cited during a physical plant and life-safety inspection, unless, in consultation with the section within the Division of Health Service Regulation that conducts physical plant and life-safety inspections, any of the following conditions are met:

The noncompliance with the law or regulation continues and the noncompliance constitutes a Type A1 Violation, a Type A2 Violation, or a Type B Violation, as defined in

G.S. 131D-34

.

The facility has not submitted a plan of correction for the physical plant or life-safety citation that has been accepted by the section within the Division of Health Service Regulation that conducts physical plant and life-safety inspections.

The noncompliance with the physical plant or life-safety law and regulation cited by the section within the Division of Health Service Regulation that conducts physical plant and life-safety inspections has not been corrected within the time frame allowed for correction or has increased in severity.Nothing in this subsection prevents a licensing inspector from referring a concern about physical plant and life-safety requirements to the section within the Division of Health Service Regulation that conducts physical plant and life-safety inspections.

(a1)

Waiver of Annual State Inspection. —

The Division of Health Service Regulation may waive the annual inspection requirement under subsection (a) of this section for any adult care home that has achieved the highest rating in accordance with rules adopted by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission pursuant to

G.S. 131D-10

. However, at least once every two years the Division of Health Service Regulation shall inspect any adult care home for which the annual inspection requirement was waived.

(a2)

Informal Dispute Resolution — Division of Health Service Regulation. —

(1)

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall offer each adult care home an opportunity, at the facility’s request and upon the facility’s receipt of the official statement of deficiencies, to informally resolve disputed findings from inspections conducted by the Division of Health Service Regulation in accordance with this section.

(2)

Failure of the Division of Health Service Regulation to complete informal dispute resolution timely does not delay the effective date of any enforcement action taken by the Division of Health Service Regulation against an adult care home.

(3)

An adult care home is not entitled to seek a delay of any enforcement action against it on the grounds that the Division of Health Service Regulation has not completed informal dispute resolution prior to the effective date of the enforcement action.

If an adult care home successfully demonstrates during informal dispute resolution that any of the deficiencies cited in the official statement of deficiencies should not have been cited, the Division of Health Service Regulation shall remove the incorrectly cited deficiencies from the official statement of deficiencies and rescind any enforcement actions imposed on the adult care home solely as a result of the incorrectly cited deficiencies.

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall make available on its Internet Web site the informal dispute resolution procedures for adult care homes.

(a3)

Informal Dispute Resolution — County Departments of Social Services. —

(1)

The Division of Health Service Regulation and county department of social services shall jointly offer each adult care home an opportunity, at the facility’s request and upon the facility’s receipt of the official statement of deficiencies, to informally resolve disputed findings from inspections conducted by the county department of social services that resulted in the citation of a Type A1 violation, Type A2 violation, Uncorrected Type A1, violation, Uncorrected Type A2 violation, or Uncorrected Type B violation, in accordance with this section.

(2)

Failure of the Division of Health Service Regulation and county department of social services to complete informal dispute resolution timely does not delay the effective date of any enforcement action taken by the Division of Health Service Regulation against an adult care home.

(3)

An adult care home is not entitled to seek a delay of any enforcement action against it on the grounds that the Division of Health Service Regulation and the county department of social services has not completed informal dispute resolution prior to the effective date of the enforcement action.

(4)

If an adult care home successfully demonstrates during informal dispute resolution that any of the deficiencies cited in the official statement of deficiencies should not have been cited, the county department of social services shall remove the incorrectly cited deficiencies from the official statement of deficiencies and the Division of Health Service Regulation shall rescind any enforcement actions imposed on the adult care home solely as a result of the incorrectly cited deficiencies.

(5)

The Division of Health Service Regulation shall make available on its Internet Web site the informal dispute resolution procedures for adult care homes.

Monitoring by County. — The Department shall work with county departments of social services to do the routine monitoring in adult care homes to ensure compliance with State and federal laws, rules, and regulations in accordance with policy and procedures established by the Division of Health Service Regulation and to have the Division of Health Service Regulation oversee this monitoring. The county departments of social services shall document in a written report all on site visits, including monitoring visits, revisits, and complaint investigations. The county departments of social services shall submit to the Division of Health Service Regulation written reports of each facility visit within 20 working days of the visit.

State Review of County Compliance. — The Division of Health Service Regulation shall conduct and document annual reviews of the county departments of social services’ performance. When monitoring is not done timely or there is failure to identify or document noncompliance, the Department may intervene in the particular service in question. Department intervention shall include one or more of the following activities:

Sending staff of the Department to the county departments of social services to provide technical assistance and to monitor the services being provided by the facility.

Advising county personnel as to appropriate policies and procedures.

Establishing a plan of action to correct county performance.The Secretary may determine that the Department shall assume the county’s regulatory responsibility for the county’s adult care homes.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e); 2009-232, s. 3; 2011-99, s. 4; 2011-258, ss. 1, 2; 2017-184, s. 2; 2020-82, s. 3.

§ 131D-2.12.
Training requirements; county departments of social services.

The county departments of social services’ adult home specialists and their supervisors shall complete:

Eight hours of prebasic training within 60 days of employment;

Thirty-two hours of basic training within six months of employment;

Twenty-four hours of postbasic training within six months of the basic training program;

A minimum of eight hours of complaint investigation training within six months of employment; and

A minimum of 16 hours of statewide training annually by the Division of Health Service Regulation.

The joint training requirements by the Department shall be as provided in G.S. 143B-139.5B.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.13.
Departmental duties.

Enforcement of Room Ventilation and Temperature. — The Department shall monitor regularly the enforcement of rules pertaining to air circulation, ventilation, and room temperature in resident living quarters. These rules shall include the requirement that air conditioning or at least one fan per resident bedroom and living and dining areas be provided when the temperature in the main center corridor exceeds 80 degrees Fahrenheit.

Administrator Directory. — The Department shall keep an up-to-date directory of all persons who are administrators as defined in

G.S. 131D-2.1

.

Departmental Complaint Hotline. — Adult care homes shall post the Division of Health Service Regulation’s complaint hotline number conspicuously in a public place in the facility.

Provider File. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish and maintain a provider file to record and monitor compliance histories of facilities, owners, operators, and affiliates of nursing homes and adult care homes.

Report on Use of Restraint. — The Department shall report annually on October 1 to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services the following for the immediately preceding fiscal year:

The level of compliance of each adult care home with applicable State law and rules governing the use of physical restraint and physical hold of residents. The information shall indicate areas of highest and lowest levels of compliance.

The total number of adult care homes that reported deaths under

G.S. 131D-34.1

, the number of deaths reported by each facility, the number of deaths investigated pursuant to

G.S. 131D-34.1

, and the number found by the investigation to be related to the adult care home’s use of physical restraint or physical hold.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e); 2011-291, s. 2.47.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 2.47, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services” for “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (e).

§ 131D-2.14.
Confidentiality.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 8-53

or any other law relating to confidentiality of communications between physician and patient, in the course of an inspection conducted under

G.S. 131D-2.11

:

Department representatives may review any writing or other record concerning the admission, discharge, medication, care, medical condition, or history of any person who is or has been a resident of the facility being inspected.

Any person involved in giving care or treatment at or through the facility may disclose information to Department representatives unless the resident objects in writing to review of the resident’s records or disclosure of such information.

The facility, its employees, and any other person interviewed in the course of an inspection shall be immune from liability for damages resulting from disclosure of any information to the Department. The Department shall not disclose:

Any confidential or privileged information obtained under this section unless the resident or the resident’s legal representative authorizes disclosure in writing or unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders disclosure, or

The name of anyone who has furnished information concerning a facility without that person’s consent.The Department shall institute appropriate policies and procedures to ensure that unauthorized disclosure does not occur. All confidential or privileged information obtained under this section and the names of persons providing such information shall be exempt from Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, the Public Records Law, applies to all records of the State Division of Social Services of the Department of Health and Human Services and of any county department of social services regarding inspections of adult care facilities except for information in the records that is confidential or privileged, including medical records, or that contains the names of residents or complainants.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.15.
Resident assessments.

Initial Assessment. — The Department shall ensure that facilities conduct and complete an assessment of each resident within 72 hours of admitting the resident. In conducting the assessment, the facility shall use an assessment instrument approved in accordance with rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission. The Department shall provide ongoing training for facility personnel in the use of the approved assessment instrument.

(a1)

Assessment to Develop Service Plans and Care Plans. —

Within 30 days of admission, the facility shall conduct an assessment to develop appropriate and comprehensive service plans and care plans and to determine the level and type of facility staff that is needed to meet the needs of residents. The assessment shall determine a resident’s level of functioning and shall include, but not be limited to, cognitive status and physical functioning in activities of daily living. Activities of daily living are personal functions essential for the health and well-being of the resident. The assessment shall not serve as the basis for medical care. The assessment shall indicate if the resident requires referral to the resident’s physician or other appropriate licensed health care professional or community resource.

(a2)

Medicaid State Plan Personal Care Services Assessment. —

To fulfill the activities of daily living portion of any service plan or care plan required under subsection (a1) of this section, or any rules adopted under this Article, the facility may use a service plan that was completed within 35 days of the resident’s admission to the facility and represents the result of an assessment to determine the resident’s eligibility for personal care services under the Medicaid State Plan. If the facility uses a service plan for personal care services under the Medicaid State Plan developed within 35 days of resident admission, the facility shall be exempt from conducting an assessment of the resident’s ability to perform activities of daily living within 30 days of resident admission. For purposes of this subsection, a resident must have received an assessment to develop appropriate and comprehensive service plans and care plans no later than 35 days after resident admission or subsection (a1) of this section applies.

Review. — The Department, as part of its inspection and licensing of adult care homes, shall review assessments and related service plans and care plans for a selected number of residents. In conducting this review, the Department shall determine all of the following:

Whether the appropriate assessment instrument was administered and interpreted correctly.

Whether the facility is capable of providing the necessary services.

Whether the service plan or care plan conforms to the results of an appropriately administered and interpreted assessment.

Whether the service plans or care plans are being implemented fully and in accordance with an appropriately administered and interpreted assessment.

Penalties. — If the Department finds that the facility is not carrying out its assessment responsibilities in accordance with this section, the Department shall notify the facility and require the facility to implement a corrective action plan. The Department shall also notify the resident of the results of its review of the assessment, service plans, and care plans developed for the resident. In addition to administrative penalties, the Secretary may suspend the admission of any new residents to the facility. The suspension shall be for the period determined by the Secretary and shall remain in effect until the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit removing the suspension.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e); 2019-180, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-180, s. 1, effective July 26, 2019, rewrote the section.

§ 131D-2.16.
Rules.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the Medical Care Commission shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this Article. The Commission has the authority, in adopting rules, to specify the limitation of nursing services provided by assisted living residences. In developing rules, the Commission shall consider the need to ensure comparable quality of services provided to residents, whether these services are provided directly by a licensed assisted living provider, licensed home care agency, or hospice. In adult care homes, living arrangements where residents require supervision due to cognitive impairments, rules shall be adopted to ensure that supervision is appropriate and adequate to meet the special needs of these residents. Rule-making authority under this section is in addition to that conferred under

G.S. 131D-4.3

and

G.S. 131D-4.5

.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.17.
Impact on other laws; severability.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede any federal or State antitrust, antikickback, or safe harbor laws or regulations.

If any provisions of this section or the application of it to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-2.18.
Application of other laws.

Certification of assisted living administrators shall be as provided under Article 20A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Compliance with the Health Care Personnel Registry shall be as provided under G.S. 131E-256.

Rules for the operation of the adult care portion of a combination home, as defined in G.S. 131E-101, shall be as provided in G.S. 131E-104.

History.

2009-462, s. 1(e).

§ 131D-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 449, s. 1.

§ 131D-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 449, s. 2.

§ 131D-4.1.
Adult care homes; legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the ability to exercise personal control over one’s life is fundamental to human dignity and quality of life and that dependence on others for some assistance with daily life activities should not require surrendering personal control of informed decision making or risk taking in all areas of one’s life.

The General Assembly intends to ensure that adult care homes provide services that assist the residents in such a way as to assure quality of life and maximum flexibility in meeting individual needs and preserving individual autonomy.

History.

1995, c. 449, s. 3; c. 535, s. 9.

§ 131D-4.2.
Adult care homes; family care homes; cost reports; exemptions; enforcement.

Except for family care homes, adult care homes with a licensed capacity of seven to twenty beds, which are licensed pursuant to this Chapter, to Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, and to Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, shall submit audited reports of actual costs to the Department at least every two years in accordance with rules adopted by the Department under G.S. 143B-10. Adult care homes licensed under Chapter 131D of the General Statutes that have special care units shall include in reports required under this subsection cost reports specific to the special care unit and shall not average special care costs with other costs of the adult care home.

Except for family care homes, adult care homes with a licensed capacity of twenty-one beds or more, which are licensed pursuant to this Chapter, to Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, and to Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, shall submit audited reports of actual costs at least every two years to the Department of Health and Human Services, in accordance with rules adopted by the Department under G.S. 143B-10. Adult care homes licensed under Chapter 131D of the General Statutes that have special care units shall include in the reports required under this subsection cost reports specific to the special care unit and shall not average special care costs with other costs of the adult care home.

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-334, s. 3.1.

Facilities that do not receive State/County Special Assistance or Medicaid personal care are exempt from the reporting requirements of this section.

The Department shall establish specific reporting deadlines for each type of facility required to report under this section. If the Department finds good cause for delay, it may extend the deadline for filing a report for up to an additional 30 days.

The Department shall have the authority to conduct audits and review audits submitted pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

The Department shall suspend admissions to facilities that fail to submit annual reports by the applicable reporting deadline or by the date established by the Department when good cause for delay is found pursuant to G.S. 131D-4.2(e). Suspension of admissions shall remain in effect until reports are submitted or licenses are suspended or revoked under subdivision (2) of this subsection. The Department may take either or both of the following actions to enforce compliance by a facility with this section, or to punish noncompliance:

Seek a court order to enforce compliance;

Suspend or revoke the facility’s license, subject to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The report documentation shall be used to adjust the adult care home rate at least every two years, an adjustment that is in addition to the annual standard adjustment for inflation as determined by the Office of State Budget and Management. Rates for family care homes shall be based on market rate data. The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall adopt rules for the rate-setting methodology and audited cost reports in accordance with G.S. 143B-10.

History.

1995, c. 449, s. 3; c. 535, s. 10; 1997-73, ss. 1, 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-212, s. 12.1A; 1999-334, ss. 3.1, 3.2; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-157, s. 1; 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2016-94, s. 12G.2.

§ 131D-4.3.
Adult care home rules.

Pursuant to G.S. 143B-165, the North Carolina Medical Care Commission shall adopt rules to ensure at a minimum, but shall not be limited to, the provision of each of the following by adult care homes:

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-111, s. 1.

A minimum of 80 hours of training for personal care aides. The training for aides shall be comparable to State-approved Certified Nurse Aide I training.

The facility may exempt from the 80-hour training requirement any personal care aides who are or have been either licensed as a health care professional or listed on the Nurse Aide Registry.

Monitoring and supervision of residents.

Oversight and quality of care as stated in

G.S. 131D-4.1

.

Adult care homes shall comply with all of the following staffing requirements:

First shift (morning): 0.4 hours of aide duty for each resident (licensed capacity or resident census), or 8.0 hours of aide duty per each 20 residents (licensed capacity or resident census) plus 3.0 hours for all other residents, whichever is greater;

Second shift (afternoon): 0.4 hours of aide duty for each resident (licensed capacity or resident census), or 8.0 hours of aide duty per each 20 residents plus 3.0 hours for all other residents (licensed capacity or resident census), whichever is greater;

Third shift (evening): 8.0 hours of aide duty per 30 or fewer residents (licensed capacity or resident census).

The facility shall provide staff to meet the needs of the facility’s residents. Each facility shall post in a conspicuous place information about required staffing that enables residents and their families to ascertain each day the number of direct care staff and supervisors that are required by law to be on duty for each shift for that day.

Rules to implement this section shall be adopted as emergency rules in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Department may suspend or revoke a facility’s license, subject to the provisions of Chapter 150B, to enforce compliance by a facility with this section or to punish noncompliance.

History.

1995, c. 449, s. 3; c. 535, s. 10; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-212, s. 12.16B(a); 2000-111, s. 1; 2001-85, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 85(a); 2017-184, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to posting of information indicating number of nursing home staff on duty, see G.S. 131E-114.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-184, s. 3, effective October 1, 2017, rewrote subsection (a).

§ 131D-4.4.
Adult care home minimum safety requirements; smoking prohibited inside long-term care facilities; penalty.

In addition to other requirements established by this Article or by rules adopted pursuant to this Article or other provisions of law, every adult care home shall provide to each resident the care, safety, and services necessary to enable the resident to attain and maintain the highest practicable level of physical, emotional, and social well-being in accordance with:

The resident’s individual assessment and plan of care; and

Rules and standards relating to quality of care and safety adopted under this Chapter.

Smoking is prohibited inside long-term care facilities. As used in this section:

“Long-term care facilities” include adult care homes, nursing homes, skilled nursing facilities, facilities licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, and other licensed facilities that provide long-term care services.

“Smoking” means the use or possession of any lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe, or other lighted smoking product.

“Inside” means a fully enclosed area.

The person who owns, manages, operates, or otherwise controls a long-term care facility where smoking is prohibited under this section shall:

Conspicuously post signs clearly stating that smoking is prohibited inside the facility. The signs may include the international “No Smoking” symbol, which consists of a pictorial representation of a burning cigarette enclosed in a red circle with a red bar across it.

Direct any person who is smoking inside the facility to extinguish the lighted smoking product.

Provide written notice to individuals upon admittance that smoking is prohibited inside the facility and obtain the signature of the individual or the individual’s representative acknowledging receipt of the notice.

The Department may impose an administrative penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each violation on any person who owns, manages, operates, or otherwise controls the long-term care facility and fails to comply with subsection (c) of this section. A violation of this section constitutes a civil offense only and is not a crime.

History.

1999-334, s. 1.1; 2007-459, s. 1.

§ 131D-4.4A.
Adult care home infection prevention requirements.

As used in this section, “adult care home staff” means any employee of an adult care home.

In order to prevent transmission of infectious diseases, each adult care home shall do all of the following:

Implement written infection prevention and control policies and procedures that are based on accepted national standards consistent with the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines on infection control, which shall be maintained in the facility and accessible to adult care home staff working at the facility. The policies and procedures shall address at least all of the following:

Proper disposal of single-use equipment used to puncture skin, mucous membranes, and other tissues, and proper disinfection of reusable resident care items that are used for multiple residents.

Sanitation of rooms and equipment, including cleaning procedures, agents, and schedules.

Accessibility of infection control devices and supplies.

Blood and bodily fluid precautions.

Procedures to be followed when adult care home staff is exposed to blood or other body fluids of another person in a manner that poses a significant risk of transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, or other bloodborne pathogens.

Procedures to prohibit adult care home staff with exudative lesions or weeping dermatitis from engaging in direct resident care that involves the potential for contact between the resident, equipment, or devices and the lesion or dermatitis until the condition resolves.

Standard and transmission-based precautions, including the following:

Respiratory hygiene and cough etiquette.

Environmental cleaning and disinfection.

Reprocessing and disinfection of reusable resident devices.

Hand hygiene.

Accessibility and proper use of personal protective equipment.

Types of transmission-based precautions and when each type is indicated, including contact precautions, droplet precautions, and airborne precautions.

In accordance with the public health laws of North Carolina, when and how to report to the local health department a suspected or confirmed, reportable communicable disease case or condition, or a communicable disease outbreak.

Procedures for ensuring that residents, representatives of residents, and adult care home staff are informed of the following without disclosing any personally identifiable information of the facility’s residents or staff:

The existence of a communicable disease outbreak within 24 hours following confirmation of the outbreak by the local health department.

When the communicable disease outbreak has resolved.

Any changes to facility operations during the communicable disease outbreak, such as visitation policy changes.

Measures the facility should consider for specific types of communicable disease outbreaks in order to prevent the spread of illness, such as:

Isolating infected residents.

Limiting or stopping group activities and communal dining.

Limiting or restricting outside visitation to the facility.

Screening staff, residents, and visitors for signs of illness.

Using source control as tolerated by the residents.

Strategies for addressing potential staffing issues and ensuring adequate staffing is available to meet the needs of the residents during a communicable disease outbreak.

Require and monitor compliance with the facility’s infection prevention and control policies and procedures.

Update the infection prevention and control policies and procedures as necessary to maintain consistency with accepted national standards in infection prevention and control.

Designate one on-site staff member for each noncontiguous facility who is knowledgeable about the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines on infection control to direct the facility’s infection control activities and ensure that all adult care home staff is trained in the facility’s written infection prevention and control policies and procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section within 30 days after hire and annually thereafter. Any nonsupervisory staff member designated to direct the facility’s infection control activities shall complete the infection control course developed by the Department pursuant to

G.S. 131D-4.5

C.

When a communicable disease outbreak has been identified at a facility or there is an emerging infectious disease threat, the facility shall ensure implementation of the facility’s infection control and prevention policies and procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section; provided, however, that if guidance or directives specific to a communicable disease outbreak or emerging infectious disease threat have been issued in writing by the Department or local health department, the Department’s or local health department’s specific guidance or directives shall be implemented by the facility.

History.

2011-99, s. 3; 2021-180, s. 9E.7(a); 2021-189, s. 3.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9E.7(a), effective January 1, 2022, rewrote the introductory language of subsection (b) and subdivision (b)(1); substituted “resident” for “patient” in subdivision (b)(1)a; added subdivisions (b)(1)g through (b)(1)j; added “prevention and” in subdivision (b)(2); rewrote subdivision (b)(3); substituted “written infection prevention and control policy developed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section within 30 days after hire and annually thereafter. Any” for “infection control policy. Beginning October 1, 2013, any” in subdivision (b)(4); and added subdivision (b)(5).

Session Laws 2021-189, s. 3.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, deleted “involved in direct resident care” from the end of subsection (a); substituted “policies and procedures” for “policy” throughout subsection (b); rewrote the introductory language of subdivision (b)(1); rewrote subdivision (b)(1)h; added subdivision (b)(1)i and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “accepted national standards in infection prevention and control” for “the guidelines included in the course developed by the Department pursuant to G.S. 131D_4.5C.” in subdivision (b)(3); substituted “adult care home staff” for “adult care staff” in subdivision (b)(4); and deleted “and related policies and procedures” following “this section” in subdivision (b)(5).

§ 131D-4.4B.
Guidelines for reporting suspected communicable disease outbreaks.

The Department shall develop guidelines prescribing the manner in which an adult care home is to report a suspected communicable disease outbreak within the facility to the local health department.

History.

2011-99, s. 3.

§ 131D-4.5.
Rules adopted by Medical Care Commission.

The Medical Care Commission shall adopt rules as follows:

Establishing minimum medication administration standards for adult care homes. The rules shall include the minimum staffing and training requirements for medication aides and standards for professional supervision of adult care homes’ medication controls. The requirements shall (i) include compliance with

G.S. 131D-4.5

B and (ii) be designed to reduce the medication error rate in adult care homes to an acceptable level. The requirements shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

Training for medication aides, including periodic refresher training.

Standards for management of complex medication regimens.

Oversight by licensed professionals.

Measures to ensure proper storage of medication.

Establishing training requirements for adult care home staff in behavioral interventions. The training shall include appropriate responses to behavioral problems posed by adult care residents. The training shall emphasize safety and humane care and shall specifically include alternatives to the use of restraints.

Establishing minimum training and education qualifications for supervisors in adult care homes and specifying the safety responsibilities of supervisors. The minimum training qualifications shall include compliance with

G.S. 131D-4.5

C.

Specifying the qualifications of staff who shall be on duty in adult care homes during various portions of the day in order to assure safe and quality care for the residents. The rules shall take into account varied resident needs and population mixes.

Implementing the due process and appeal rights for discharge and transfer of residents in adult care homes afforded by

G.S. 131D-21

. The rules shall offer protections to residents for safe and orderly transfer and discharge.

Establishing procedures for determining the compliance history of adult care homes’ principals and affiliates. The rules shall include criteria for refusing to license facilities which have a history of, or have principals or affiliates with a history of, noncompliance with State law, or disregard for the health, safety, and welfare of residents.

For the licensure of special care units in accordance with

G.S. 131D-4.6

, and for disclosures required to be made under

G.S. 131D-8

.

For time limited provisional licenses and for granting extensions for provisional licenses.

For the issuance of certificates to adult care homes as authorized under

G.S. 131D-10

.

History.

1999-334, s. 1.1; 2000-111, s. 2; 2007-544, s. 3(a); 2011-99, ss. 1, 2; 2011-272, s. 2.

§ 131D-4.5A.
Fees for medication aides.

The Department may impose a fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), on an applicant seeking certification as an assisted living home medication aide to cover the costs of testing and materials in administering a certification examination.

History.

2010-31, s. 10.36A(a).

Cross References.

As to fees for assisted living administrator certification, see G.S. 90-288.15A.